Hawaii statutes.
§334-134 Hearing for discharge. Any
person may petition the family court for the discharge of an order of assisted
community treatment during the period of assisted community treatment after
sixty days from the most recent hearing involving the subject of the order.
The petition shall be filed, notice given, hearing held, and order made in the
same manner as provided for the original petition alleging that the subject of
the order met the criteria for assisted community treatment. [L 1984, c 251, pt
of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §§20, 24; am L 2016, c 114, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next